District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2033

Dedication of sales tax revenue for the Public School Capital Improvement Fund.

Repealed.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-123, § 121(b), 53 DRC 2843
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-294, § 17, 54 DCR 1086
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 4042(b)(1), 54 DCR 7052
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 7012(b)(2), 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4042(b)(1) of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 7012(b)(2) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).